Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-205
Board of trustees; quorum; compulsory attendance.

At all meetings of the village board of trustees, a majority of the trustees shall constitute a quorum to do business. A smaller number may adjourn from day to day and may compel the attendance of absent members in such manner and under such penalties as prescribed by the village board of trustees by ordinance.

Laws 1879, § 44, p. 203;

R.S.1913, § 5055;

C.S.1922, § 4227;

C.S.1929, § 17-205;

R.S.1943, § 17-205;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 66.